csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_Imp_rcp.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     waabandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlProx: waabandisigwaa
     waabandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabandisinig
     waabandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+Excl: waabandisiwaang
     waabandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+Incl: waabandisiwang
     waabandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlProx: waabandiwaad
     waabandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+3SgObv/3PlObv: waabandinid
     waabandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+Excl: waabandiyaang
     waabandiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+Incl: waabandiyang
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3PlProx: waabandisiiwag
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3PlObv: waabandisiiwa'
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+Excl: niwaabandisiimin
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+Incl: giwaabandisiimin
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3PlProx: waabandiwag
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3SgObv: waabandiwan
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3PlObv: waabandiwa'
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+Excl: niwaabandimin
     waabandiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+Incl: giwaabandimin
     waabandiwag+VAI+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+Incl: waabandidaa
     waabandiwag+VAI+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+Incl: waabandisiidaa
